Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PARKS AND TRAILS FUND APPROPRIATION EXTENSIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Cannon Valley Trail; Goodhue County. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to Goodhue County for the Cannon Valley Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Beaver Island Trail; Stearns County. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to Stearns County for the Beaver Island Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bluffs Traverse Trail; city of Winona. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Winona for the Bluffs Traverse Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Jay C. Hormel Nature Center; city of Austin. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Austin for the Jay C. Hormel Nature Center project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Spirit Mountain Recreation Area; city of Duluth. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Duluth for the Spirit Mountain Recreation Area project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Waabizheshikana/Marten Trail; city of Duluth. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Duluth for the Waabizheshikana/Marten Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end